Indiana, session 2026, HB1401.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-7-2-28.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 28.2. "Child care", for purposes of IC 12-17-20
and IC 12-17.2, means a service that provides for the care, health,
safety, and supervision of a child's social, emotional, and educational
growth.
SECTION 2. IC 12-7-2-29.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 29.1. "Child care provider", for purposes of
IC 12-17-20, means a person that:
(1) provides child care; and
(2) either:
(A) meets the standards of quality recognized by a Level 3
or Level 4 paths to QUALITY program rating under
IC 12-17.2-2-14.2; or
(B) has a comparable rating from a nationally recognized
accrediting body.
2026 IN 1401—LS 6779/DI 148


SECTION 3. IC 12-7-2-42 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 42. (a) "Contribution",
for purposes of IC 12-17-12, has the meaning set forth in
IC 12-17-12-2.
(b) "Contribution", for purposes of IC 12-17-20, means a
payment to a child care provider either:
(1) directly by an employer; or
(2) indirectly through a third party vendor;
to subsidize an employee's eligible child care costs.
SECTION 4. IC 12-7-2-69, AS AMENDED BY THE TECHNICAL
CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IS
AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]:
Sec. 69. (a) "Division", except as provided in subsections (b), (c), and
(d), refers to any of the following:
(1) The division of disability and rehabilitative services
established by IC 12-9-1-1.
(2) The division of aging established by IC 12-9.1-1-1.
(3) The division of family resources established by IC 12-13-1-1.
(4) The division of mental health and addiction established by
IC 12-21-1-1.
(b) The term refers to the following:
(1) For purposes of the following statutes, the division of
disability and rehabilitative services established by IC 12-9-1-1:
(A) IC 12-9.
(B) IC 12-11.
(C) IC 12-12.
(D) IC 12-12.7.
(E) IC 12-28-5.
(2) For purposes of the following statutes, the division of aging
established by IC 12-9.1-1-1:
(A) IC 12-9.1.
(B) IC 12-10.
(C) IC 12-10.5.
(3) For purposes of the following statutes, the division of family
resources established by IC 12-13-1-1:
(A) IC 12-8-12.
(B) IC 12-13.
(C) IC 12-14.
(D) IC 12-15.
(E) IC 12-16.
(F) IC 12-17.
(F) (G) IC 12-17.2.
2026 IN 1401—LS 6779/DI 148


(G) (H) IC 12-18.
(H) (I) IC 12-19.
(I) (J) IC 12-20.
(4) For purposes of the following statutes, the division of mental
health and addiction established by IC 12-21-1-1:
(A) IC 12-21.
(B) IC 12-22.
(C) IC 12-23.
(D) IC 12-25.
(c) With respect to a particular state institution, the term refers to
the division whose director has administrative control of and
responsibility for the state institution.
(d) For purposes of IC 12-24, IC 12-26, and IC 12-27, the term
refers to the division whose director has administrative control of and
responsibility for the appropriate state institution.
SECTION 5. IC 12-7-2-75.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 75.8. "Eligible child care costs", for purposes of
IC 12-17-20, means money an individual pays for services rendered
by a child care provider (as defined in section 29.1 of this chapter).
SECTION 6. IC 12-7-2-76.8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2018,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 76.8. (a) "Employee", for purposes of
IC 12-17-20, means an individual who works in Indiana and works
for an employer.
(b) "Employer", for purposes of IC 12-17-20, means a person
with at least one (1) employee who works in Indiana in each of
twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year.
(a) (c) "Employed", "employee", "employment", or "employs", for
purposes of IC 12-17.2-3.5, has the meaning set forth in
IC 12-17.2-3.5-1.3.
(b) (d) "Employee", for purposes of IC 12-23-23, has the meaning
set forth in IC 12-23-23-1.
SECTION 7. IC 12-7-2-91, AS AMENDED BY P.L.152-2024,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 91. "Fund" means the following:
(1) For purposes of IC 12-12-1-9, the fund described in
IC 12-12-1-9.
(2) For purposes of IC 12-15-20, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-15-20-1.
(3) For purposes of IC 12-17-12, the meaning set forth in
2026 IN 1401—LS 6779/DI 148


IC 12-17-12-4.
(4) For purposes of IC 12-17-20, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-17-20-1.
(4) (5) For purposes of IC 12-17.2-7.2, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-17.2-7.2-4.7.
(5) (6) For purposes of IC 12-17.6, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-17.6-1-3.
(6) (7) For purposes of IC 12-21-9, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-21-9-1.
(7) (8) For purposes of IC 12-23-2, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-23-2-1.
(8) (9) For purposes of IC 12-23-18, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-23-18-4.
(9) (10) For purposes of IC 12-24-6, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-24-6-1.
(10) (11) For purposes of IC 12-24-14, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-24-14-1.
(11) (12) For purposes of IC 12-30-7, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-30-7-3.
SECTION 8. IC 12-7-2-139.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 139.2. "Program", for purposes
of IC 12-17-20, means the employee child care assistance
partnership program established by IC 12-17-20-3.
SECTION 9. IC 12-7-2-178.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 178.7. "Small business", for
purposes of IC 12-17-20, means an employer that employs not
more than forty-nine (49) employees working at least thirty-five
(35) hours per week.
SECTION 10. IC 12-7-2-184.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 184.1. "State match", for
purposes of IC 12-17-20, means any money paid to the child care
provider by the division of family resources from the employee
child care assistance partnership fund established by
IC 12-17-20-2, whether the money used from the fund derives from
a state, federal, or nonprofit source.
SECTION 11. IC 12-17-20 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 20. Employee Child Care Assistance Partnership
2026 IN 1401—LS 6779/DI 148


Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "fund" means the employee child
care assistance partnership fund established by section 2 of this
chapter.
Sec. 2. (a) The employee child care assistance partnership fund
is established to carry out the purpose of the program. The division
shall administer the fund.
(b) The fund consists of the following, which may derive from a
state, federal, or nonprofit source:
(1) Appropriations.
(2) Contributions.
(3) Grants.
(4) Donations.
(c) Money in the fund at the end of the state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
(d) The expenses of administering the fund must be paid from
money in the fund. However, in each state fiscal year, the total cost
of administration must not exceed five percent (5%) of the total
fund.
Sec. 3. (a) The employee child care assistance partnership
program is established to incentivize an employer to contribute to
the child care costs of the employer's employees. The division shall
administer the program.
(b) The division shall do the following:
(1) Create and make available a standardized contract for
participation in the program.
(2) Process the contract between an employer, employee, and
child care provider that is submitted to the division.
(3) Notify the parties under subdivision (2) of the parties'
enrollment status in the program.
(4) Manage and administer the fund.
(5) Secure third party vendors in accordance with all
applicable federal and state procurement laws.
(6) Verify the eligibility of an employee, employer, and child
care provider before distributing a state match.
(7) Collect and verify household income information from an
eligible employee and determine the amount of any state
match for which the employee is eligible.
(8) Distribute educational materials about the program's
objectives, benefits, and eligibility requirements to employers,
employees, and child care providers.
(9) Review the completed contract after it is submitted by the
2026 IN 1401—LS 6779/DI 148


employer and, if the parties are eligible and subject to section
4 of this chapter, agree to match the contribution made by the
employer up to one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of
service from the fund.
(c) The division may do the following:
(1) Delegate authority to a subsidiary division or nonprofit
organization.
(2) Subject to section 6 of this chapter, coordinate and share
information with another executive branch agency.
(3) Enter into a contract with a third party to administer
specific portions of the program.
Sec. 4. (a) If the division determines that the division's:
(1) existing contractual obligations already accrued under the
program; and
(2) additional financial obligation imposed by the proposed
contract;
do not exceed the balance of the fund, the division may become a
party to a proposed contract under the program.
(b) If the fund has an insufficient balance under subsection (a),
the division may maintain a wait list.
(c) Subject to subsection (a), the division may become a party to
a proposed contract from the wait list according to the order in
which the proposed contract was received.
Sec. 5. The division shall issue a state match:
(1) directly to the child care provider; or
(2) indirectly through a third party vendor;
for the duration of any contract that the division becomes a party
to under the program.
Sec. 6. The division shall not disclose an employee's personal
information without the employee's express written consent.
Sec. 7. (a) Beginning July 1, 2027, the division shall submit a
report to:
(1) the governor; and
(2) the legislative council, in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6;
not later than December 15 of each year.
(b) The report described in subsection (a) must include the
following:
(1) The overall efficacy of the program.
(2) Any appropriation made in the previous state fiscal year
to the fund.
(3) The total number of standardized contracts submitted by
2026 IN 1401—LS 6779/DI 148


employers.
(4) The total amount of state matches paid out of the fund by
the division.
(5) The breakdown of the state matches paid by county.
(6) Information on the size, geographical location, and
industry type of participating employers.
(7) The number, license type, quality rating, and geographical
location of participating child care providers.
(8) The average cost for services charged by participating
child care providers and information on how the cost of
services has increased or decreased in the most recent
previous reporting period.
(9) The number and total dollar value of contracts not
approved by the division.
(10) The demographic information of employees participating
in the program.
Sec. 8. A state match must not exceed one hundred percent
(100%) of the contribution made by the employer.
Sec. 9. In each state fiscal year, the division shall distribute
twenty-five percent (25%) of the total fund to contracts in which
the employer is a small business.
Sec. 10. A state match provided under this chapter is for the
general welfare and is not subject to taxation under IC 6-3-1
through IC 6-3-7 and IC 6-3.6.
Sec. 11. The division may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to carry
out this chapter.
Sec. 12. (a) If an employment relationship is terminated by
either the employee or the employer, the employer shall notify:
(1) the child care provider; and
(2) the division;
not more than three (3) business days after the relationship is
terminated. An active contract under the program is considered
terminated on the date provided by the employer in the notice
under this subsection.
(b) If an employer fails to make the notice described in
subsection (a) and the division issues a state match to the provider
on behalf of the employee thereafter, the employer shall reimburse
the division for the unnecessary state match.
Sec. 13. (a) If an employer fails to make a contribution for the
eligible child care costs according to the terms of an active contract
under the program, the child care provider shall notify the division
not more than five (5) business days after an employer fails to
2026 IN 1401—LS 6779/DI 148


make the contribution.
(b) After receiving notice under subsection (a), the division
shall:
(1) temporarily cease making a state match on behalf of the
employee; and
(2) notify the employer that the contract will be terminated
unless the employer remedies the nonpayment not more than
five (5) business days after receiving the notice from the
division under this subdivision.
(c) If the provider fails to make the notice described in
subsection (a) and receives a state match from the division
thereafter, the child care provider shall reimburse the division for
the unnecessary state match.
Sec. 14. (a) If an employee fails to pay the child care provider
according to the payment terms in the contract, the child care
provider may do one (1) or both of the following:
(1) Give the employee reasonable time to remedy the
nonpayment.
(2) Notify the division and terminate the contract.
(b) If a child care provider:
(1) voluntarily excuses the employee's nonpayment; or
(2) fails to notify the division under subsection (a)(2) not more
than two (2) calendar months after the date of the employee's
failure to pay and continues to provide child care to the
employee's child;
the child care provider shall reimburse the division for any state
match and the employer for any employer contribution that the
child care provider received.
Sec. 15. (a) The following may terminate the contract at any
time for any reason:
(1) The employer.
(2) The employee.
(3) The child care provider.
(b) The terminating party shall:
(1) notify all parties to the contract; and
(2) specify the desired termination date, which must occur not
sooner than two (2) weeks after the date of notification unless:
(A) the child care provider gives its consent to an earlier
termination date; or
(B) the child care provider is the terminating party.
(c) All parties to the contract are financially obligated,
according to the terms of the contract, up to the termination date.
2026 IN 1401—LS 6779/DI 148


(d) The child care provider shall return any employer
contribution or state match for services not rendered following the
contract's termination not more than five (5) business days after
the child care provider receives the contribution or state match.
Sec. 16. (a) The division may impose a civil penalty of not more
than five hundred dollars ($500) per violation for any person who
intentionally gives false information under this chapter.
(b) A penalty collected under subsection (a) must be deposited
into the fund.
Sec. 17. There is annually appropriated to the fund an amount
necessary from the state general fund for its use in carrying out the
purposes of the fund.
2026 IN 1401—LS 6779/DI 148